District of Columbia statutes.
18-104

Devises, legacies, etc., to attesting witnesses.

(a)

A beneficial devise, legacy, estate, interest, gift, or power of appointment of or affecting real or personal estate, given or made to an attesting witness to a will or codicil is void as to him and persons claiming under him, except as provided by subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

(b)

Where an interested witness to a will or codicil, referred to in subsection (a) of this section, would be entitled to a share of the estate of the testator in case the will or codicil were not established, he or persons claiming under him shall take such portion of the devise or bequest made to him in the will or codicil as does not exceed the share of the estate which would be distributed to him or persons claiming under him in case of intestacy.

(c)

The voidance provided for by subsection (a) of this section does not apply to charges on real estate for the payment of debts.

(d)

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, an interested witness referred to therein, whether an heir at law or not, is not disqualified as a competent witness to the execution of the will or codicil by reason of his interest.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 686, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 18-104.
1973 Ed., § 18-104.